Utah statutes.
53-1-109.   Security for capitol complex -- Traffic and parking rules
enforcement for division -- Security personnel as law enforcement officers.
(1)  As used in this section, "capitol hill facilities" and "capitol hill
grounds" have the same meaning as provided in Section 63C-9-102.
(2) (a)  The commissioner, under the direction of the State Capitol
Preservation Board, shall:
(i)  provide for the security of capitol hill facilities and capitol hill
grounds; and
(ii)  enforce traffic provisions under Title 41, Chapter 6a, Traffic Code, and
parking rules, as adopted by the State Capitol Preservation Board, for capitol
hill facilities and capitol hill grounds.
(b)  The commissioner, in cooperation with the director of the Division of
Facilities Construction and Management shall provide for the security of all
grounds and buildings under the jurisdiction of the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management.
(3)  Security personnel required in Subsection (2) shall be law enforcement
officers as defined in Section 53-13-103.
(4)  Security personnel who were actively employed and had five or more years
of active service with Protective Services within the Utah Highway Patrol
Division as special function officers, as defined in Section 53-13-105, on
June 29, 1996, shall become law enforcement officers:
(a)  without a requirement of any additional training or examinations, if they
have completed the entire law enforcement officer training of the Peace
Officers Standards and Training Division; or
(b)  upon completing only the academic portion of the law enforcement officer
training of the Peace Officers Standards and Training Division.
(5)  An officer in a supervisory position with Protective Services within the
Utah Highway Patrol Division shall be allowed to transfer the job title that
the officer held on April 28, 1996, into a comparable supervisory position of
employment as a peace officer for as long as the officer remains with
Protective Services within the Utah Highway Patrol Division.
